Illinois, session 104th, HB614.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Protection and Advocacy for Persons with 5Developmental Disabilities Act is amended by changing Section 60.01 as follows: 7    (405 ILCS 40/0.01)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1150)8    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Protection and Advocacy for Persons with Developmental 10Disabilities Act.11(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)